California statutes. Education Code
22122.7.

“Defined Benefit Supplement contributions” means member contributions and employer contributions that are credited by the system to the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account pursuant to Section 25004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22123.

(a) “Dependent child” or “dependent children” under the disability allowance and family allowance programs means a member’s unmarried offspring or stepchild who is under 22 years of age and who is financially dependent upon the member on the effective date of the member’s disability allowance or the date of the member’s death.

(b) “Offspring” shall include the member’s child who is born within the 10-month period commencing on the earlier of the member’s disability allowance effective date or the date of the member’s death.

(c) “Offspring” shall include a child adopted by the member.

(d) “Dependent child” shall not include the member’s offspring or stepchild who is adopted by a person other than the member’s spouse.

(e) “Dependent child” under the family allowance program shall not include:

(1) The member’s offspring or stepchild who was financially dependent on the member on the date of the member’s death if a disability allowance was payable to the member prior to his or her death and the disability allowance did not include an amount payable for that offspring or stepchild.

(2) A stepchild or adopted child acquired subsequent to the death of the member.

(f) “Financially dependent” for purposes of this section means that at least one-half of the child’s support was being provided by the member on the member’s disability allowance effective date or the date of the member’s death. The system may require that income tax records or other data be submitted to substantiate the child’s financial dependence. In the absence of substantiating documentation, the system may determine that the child was not dependent on the effective date of the member’s disability allowance or the date of the member’s death.

(g) “Member” as used in this section shall have the same meaning specified in Section 23800.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22123.5.

(a) “Dependent child” or “dependent children” under the disability retirement and survivor benefit allowance programs means a member’s offspring or stepchild who is under 21 years of age and who is financially dependent upon the member on the effective date of the member’s disability retirement or the date of the member’s death.

(b) “Offspring” shall include the member’s child who is born within the 10-month period commencing on the earlier of the member’s disability retirement effective date or the date of the member’s death.

(c) “Offspring” shall include a child adopted by the member.

(d) “Dependent child” shall not include the member’s offspring or stepchild who is adopted by a person other than the member’s spouse.

(e) “Dependent child” under the survivor benefit allowance program shall not include a stepchild or adopted child acquired subsequent to the death of the member.

(f) “Financially dependent” for purposes of this section means that at least one-half of the child’s support was being provided by the member on the member’s disability retirement effective date or the date of the member’s death. The system may require that income tax records or other data be submitted to substantiate the child’s financial dependence. In the absence of substantiating documentation, the system may determine that the child was not dependent on the effective date of the member’s disability retirement or the date of the member’s death.

(g) “Member” as used in this section shall have the same meaning specified in Section 23850.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22124.

“Dependent parent” means a natural parent of a member, or a parent who adopted the member prior to the earlier of the occurrence of the member’s marriage or his or her attaining 18 years of age, and who was receiving one-half or more of his or her support from the member at the time of the member’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22126.

“Disability” or “disabled” means any medically determinable physical or mental impairment that is permanent or that can be expected to last continuously for at least 12 months, measured from the onset of the disability, but no earlier than the day following the last day of actual performance of service that prevents a member from performing the member’s usual duties for the member’s employer, the member’s usual duties for the member’s employer with reasonable modifications, or the duties of a comparable level position for which the member is qualified or can become qualified within a reasonable period of time by education, training, or experience. Any impairment from a willful self-inflicted injury shall not constitute a
 disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22127.

“Disability allowance” means the amount payable to a disabled member on a monthly basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22127.2.

“Disability benefit” means the amount payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program based on the balance of credits in a member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account to either a disabled member pursuant to Section 24005 or to a member who retired for disability pursuant to Section 24105.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22128.

“Early retirement” and “early retirement age” mean the age of 55 years, which is the age upon attainment of which the member becomes eligible under the Defined Benefit Program for a service retirement allowance with reduction because of age and without special qualifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22129.

“Educational institution” means any accredited public or private institution whose primary purpose is to provide classroom teaching and includes a high school, trade or vocational school or college, community college, or other college or university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22130.

“Effective date” means the date upon which the benefit becomes payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22131.

(a) (1) “Employer” or “employing agency” means the state or any agency or political subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to, a joint powers authority, for which creditable service subject to coverage by the plan is performed.

(2) In the case of a joint powers authority, all of the following criteria shall be met:

(A) The joint powers authority shall be formed pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(B) All entities included in the joint powers
 authority shall be entities at which creditable service subject to coverage by the plan is performed.

(C) The joint powers authority shall report through a single county office of education, with that county superintendent having responsibility for activities specified under this part, including but not limited to, reporting and remitting contributions.

(b) This section shall be administered in compliance with the requirements defining a governmental plan set forth in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 414(d)).

(c) The board shall have final authority for determining an “employer” or “employing agency” for purposes of this part and Part 13.5 (commencing with Section
 25900).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   (SB 853)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22132.

“Employed” or “employment” means employment to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program or the Defined Benefit Supplement Program, except as otherwise specifically provided under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22132.5.

“Exclusive representative” means an exclusive representative as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22133.

“Family allowance” means amounts payable to eligible survivors provided pursuant to Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 23800) after June 30, 1972.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22133.5.

“Final benefit” means the amount payable to a beneficiary under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program upon the death of the member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22134.

(a) “Final compensation” means the highest average annual compensation earnable, as defined by Section 22115, by a member during any period of 36 consecutive months of service while an active member of the Defined Benefit Program or time during which he or she was not a member but for which the member has received credit under the Defined Benefit Program, except time that was so credited for service performed outside this state prior to July 1, 1944.

(b) For purposes of this section, periods of service separated by breaks in service or by periods in which a member’s salary was reduced because of a reduction in school funds as certified by the employer may be aggregated, if the periods
 of service are consecutive except for the breaks or periods of salary reduction.

(c) The following shall be considered periods of service for the purpose of determining final compensation:

(1) The full pay period if the member earns creditable compensation within that pay period, but not beyond the benefit effective date except as provided in paragraph (3).

(2) The months of the school year preceding the school term if the member earns creditable compensation during the first pay period of that school term.

(3) The months of the school year following the school term if the member earns creditable compensation during the last pay period of that school
 term.

(4) Any period that is excluded from the school term if a member earns creditable compensation during the pay periods immediately preceding and immediately following the excluded period.

(d) For purposes of determining the final compensation of a member who is eligible for concurrent retirement as defined in Section 22115.5, the compensation a person could earn for services rendered on a full-time basis under a retirement system with which the member has concurrent membership, as defined in Section 22115.2, shall be considered compensation earnable, provided that both of the following exist:

(1) The compensation under the other system was not earned during the periods of service determined pursuant to
 subdivision (c) under the Defined Benefit Program.

(2) Retirement for service under the Defined Benefit Program is concurrent with the member’s retirement for service under the other system pursuant to Section 22115.5.

(e) The creditable compensation for the first school year in which a member earned creditable compensation shall be used when additional months of creditable compensation are required for the purpose of determining final compensation.

(f) If a member has received service credit for part-time service performed prior to July 1, 1956, the member’s final compensation shall be adjusted for that service in excess of one year by the ratio that part-time service bears to full-time service.

(g) For purposes of calculating a benefit that does not include service credit, final compensation shall be the highest average annual creditable compensation earned by a member during any period of 36 consecutive months of service, excluding compensation for which contributions are credited to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program. Final compensation determined pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(h) The amendment of former Section 22127 made by Chapter 782 of the Statutes of 1982 does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 3.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22134.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22134, “final compensation” means the highest average annual compensation earnable, as defined in Section 22115, by a member during any period of 12 consecutive months of service while an active member of the Defined Benefit Program or time during which he or she was not a member but for which the member has received credit under the Defined Benefit Program, except time that was so credited for service performed outside this state prior to July 1, 1944.

(b) For purposes of this section, periods of service separated by breaks in service may be aggregated, if the periods of service are consecutive except for the breaks.

(c) The following shall be considered periods of service for the purpose of determining final compensation:

(1) The full pay period if the member earns creditable compensation within that pay period, but not beyond the benefit effective date except as provided in paragraph (3).

(2) The months of the school year preceding the school term if the member earns creditable compensation during the first pay period of that school term.

(3) The months of the school year following the school term if the member earns creditable compensation during the last pay period of that school term.

(4) Any period that is
 excluded from the school term if a member earns creditable compensation during the pay periods immediately preceding and immediately following the excluded period.

(d) For purposes of determining the final compensation of a member who is eligible for concurrent retirement as defined in Section 22115.5, the compensation a person could earn for services rendered on a full-time basis under a retirement system with which the member has concurrent membership, as defined in Section 22115.2, shall be considered compensation earnable, provided that both of the following exist:

(1) The compensation under the other system was not earned during the periods of service determined pursuant to subdivision (c)
 under the Defined Benefit Program.

(2) Retirement for service under the Defined Benefit Program is concurrent with the member’s retirement for service under the other system pursuant to Section 22115.5.

(e) If a member has received service credit for part-time service performed prior to July 1, 1956, the member’s final compensation shall be adjusted for that service in excess of one year by the ratio that part-time service bears to full-time service.

(f) For purposes of calculating a benefit that does not include service credit, final compensation shall be the highest average annual creditable compensation earned by a member during any period of 12 consecutive months of service, excluding compensation for which
 contributions are credited to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program. Final compensation determined pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(g) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) A member who has 25 or more years of credited service, excluding service credited pursuant to the following:

(A) Section 22714.

(B) Section 22715.

(C) Section 22717, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 22121.

(D) Section 22826.

(2) A nonmember spouse, if the member had 25 or more years of credited service, as calculated in paragraph (1), on the date the parties separated, as established in the judgment or court order pursuant to Section 22652.

(3) This section shall not apply to a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 4.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22135.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 22134, “final compensation” means the highest average annual compensation earnable, as defined by Section 22115, by an active member who is a classroom teacher not subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013 and who retires, becomes disabled, or dies, after June 30, 1990, during any period of 12 consecutive months while an active member of the Defined Benefit Program.

(b) Section 22134, except subdivision (a) of that section, shall apply to classroom teachers who retire after June 30, 1990, and any statutory reference to Section 22134 or “final compensation” with respect to a classroom teacher who retires,
 becomes disabled, or dies, after June 30, 1990, shall be deemed to be a reference to
 this section.

(c) As used in this section, “classroom teacher” means any of the following:

(1) All teachers and substitute teachers in positions requiring certification qualifications who spend, during the last 10 years of their employment with the same employer which immediately precedes their retirement, 60 percent or more of their contract time each year providing direct instruction. For the purpose of determining continuity of employment within the meaning of this subdivision, an authorized leave of absence for sabbatical or illness or other collectively bargained or employer-approved leaves shall not constitute a break in service.

(2) Other certificated personnel who spend, during the last 10 years
 of their employment with the same employer that immediately precedes their retirement, 60 percent or more of their
 contract time each year providing direct services to pupils, including, but not limited to, librarians, counselors, nurses, speech therapists, resource specialists, audiologists, audiometrists, hygienists, optometrists, psychologists, driver safety instructors, and personnel on special assignment to perform school attendance and adjustment services.

(d) As used in this section, “classroom teacher” does not include any of the following:

(1) Certificated employees whose job descriptions require an administrative credential.

(2) Certificated employees whose job descriptions include responsibility for supervision of certificated staff.

(3) Certificated employees who serve as advisers, coordinators, consultants, or developers or planners of curricula, instructional materials, or programs, who spend, during the last 10 years of their employment with the same employer that immediately precedes their retirement, less than 60 percent of their contract time in direct instruction.

(4) Certificated employees whose job descriptions require provision of direct instruction or services, but who are functioning in nonteaching assignments.

(5) Classified employees.

(e) This section shall apply only to teachers employed by an employer that has, pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, entered
 into, extended, renewed, or amended a written agreement with an exclusive representative, prior to January 1, 2014, that makes this section applicable to all of its classroom teachers, as defined in subdivision (c).

(f) The written agreement shall include a mechanism to pay for all increases in allowances provided for by this section through employer contributions or employee contributions or both, which shall be collected and retained by the employer in a trust fund to be used solely and exclusively to pay the system for all increases in allowances provided by this section and related administrative costs; and a mechanism for disposition of the employee’s contributions if employment is terminated before retirement, and for the establishment of a trust fund board. The trust fund board shall administer the trust fund and shall be composed of an
 equal number of members representing classroom teachers chosen by the bargaining agent and the employer. If the employer agrees to pay the total cost of increases in allowances, the establishment of a trust fund and a trust fund board shall be optional to the employer. The employer, within 30 days of receiving an invoice from the system, shall reimburse the retirement fund the amount determined by the Teachers’ Retirement Board to be the actuarial equivalent of the difference between the allowance the member or beneficiary receives pursuant to this section and the allowance the member or beneficiary would have received if the member’s final compensation had been computed under Section 22134 and the proportionate share of the cost to the plan’s Defined Benefit Program, as determined by the Teachers’ Retirement Board, of administering this section. The payment shall include the cost of all
 increases in allowances provided for by this section for all years of service credited to the member as of the benefit effective date. Interest shall be charged at the regular interest rate for any payment not received within 30 days of receipt of the invoice. Payments not received within 30 days after receipt of the invoice may be collected pursuant to Section 23007.

(g) Upon the execution of the agreement, the employer shall notify all certificated employees of the agreement and any certificated employee of the employer, who is a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to Section 22508, that he or she may, within 60 days following the date of notification, elect to terminate his or her membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System and become a member of this plan’s Defined Benefit Program. However, only
 service credited under the Defined Benefit Program subsequent to the date of that election shall be subject to this section.

(h) An employer that agrees to become subject to this section, shall, on a form and within the timeframes prescribed by the system, certify the applicability of this section to a member pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section when a retirement, disability, or family allowance becomes payable.

(i) For a nonmember spouse, final compensation shall be determined pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 22664. The employer, within 30 days of receiving an invoice from the system, shall reimburse the retirement fund pursuant to subdivision (f). Interest shall be charged at the regular interest rate for payments not received within the prescribed
 timeframe. Payments not received within 30 days of invoicing may be collected pursuant to Section 23007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 13.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22137.

With respect to a state employee member who dies or retires on or after July 1, 1991, and who was a managerial or supervisory employee, as defined by subdivisions (e) and (g) of Section 3513 of the Government Code, whose monthly salary range was administratively reduced by 5 percent because of the salary range reductions administratively imposed upon managers and supervisors during the 1991–92 fiscal year, “final compensation” means the highest annual compensation the state employee member would have earned had his or her salary range not been reduced by the 5-percent reduction. This section shall only apply if the period during which the state member’s salary was reduced would have otherwise been included in determining his or her final compensation for retirement purposes. The costs, if any, that may result from the use of the higher final compensation shall be paid for by the employer at the time of retirement in a manner prescribed by the system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22138.

“Final vesting” means the right of a member or a beneficiary to receive a monthly retirement allowance, disability allowance, a family benefit, or survivor benefits when the member has completed the minimum number of years of credited service, has attained the minimum specified age, has formally terminated his or her active service, has made application for retirement, or has been formally retired in accordance with Section 24201, after which the kind and amount of the retirement allowance is fixed and cannot thereafter be changed except as provided in this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22138.5.

(a) (1) “Full time” means the days or hours of creditable service the employer requires to be performed by a class of employees in a school term in order to earn the annualized pay rate as defined in Section 22104.8 and specified under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement or employment agreement. For the purpose of crediting service under this part, “full time” may not be less than the minimum standard specified in this section. Each collective bargaining agreement or employment agreement that applies to a member subject to the minimum standard specified in either paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (c) shall specify the number of hours of creditable service that equals “full time” pursuant to this section
 for each class of employee subject to either paragraph and make specific reference to this section, and the district shall submit a copy of the agreement to the system.

(2) The copies of each agreement shall be submitted electronically in a format determined by the system that ensures the security of the transmitted member data.

(3) The copies shall be electronically submitted annually to the system on or before July 1, or on or before the effective date of the agreement, whichever is later.

(b) The minimum standard for full time in prekindergarten through grade 12 is as follows:

(1) One hundred seventy-five days per school term or 1,050 hours per school term,
 except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) (A) One hundred ninety days per school term, or 1,520 hours per school term for all principals and program managers, including advisers, coordinators, consultants, and developers or planners of curricula, instructional materials, or programs, and for administrators, except as provided in subparagraph (B).

(B) Two hundred fifteen days per school term or 1,720 hours per school term including school and legal holidays pursuant to the policy adopted by the employer’s governing board for administrators at a county office of education.

(3) One thousand fifty hours per school term for teachers in adult education programs.

(c) The minimum standard for full time in community colleges is as follows:

(1) One hundred seventy-five days per school term or 1,050 hours per school term, except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6). Full time includes time for duties the employer requires to be performed as part of the full-time assignment for a particular class of employees.

(2) One hundred ninety days per school term or 1,520 hours per school term for all program managers and for administrators, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(3) Two hundred fifteen days per school term or 1,720 hours per school term including school and legal holidays pursuant to the policy
 adopted by the employer’s governing board for administrators at a district office.

(4) One hundred seventy-five days per school term or 1,050 hours per school term for all counselors and librarians.

(5) Five hundred twenty-five instructional hours per school term for all instructors employed on a part-time basis, except instructors specified in paragraph (6). If an instructor receives compensation for office hours pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 87880) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3, the minimum standard shall be increased appropriately by the number of office hours required annually for the class of employees.

(6) Eight hundred seventy-five instructional hours per school term for all
 instructors employed in adult education programs. If an instructor receives compensation for office hours pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 87880) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3, the minimum standard shall be increased appropriately by the number of office hours required annually for the class of employees.

(d) The board has final authority to determine full time for purposes of crediting service under this part if full time is not otherwise specified in this section.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 6.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22138.6.

“Full-time equivalent” means the days or hours of creditable service that a person who is employed on a part-time basis would be required to perform in a school term if he or she were employed full time in that part-time position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 6.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22139.5.

“Gain and Loss Reserve” means a segregated account within the retirement fund that is established and maintained to do either of the following:

(a) Credit interest to members’ Defined Benefit Supplement accounts at the minimum interest rate for plan years in which the board determines that the obligation cannot be met from the plan’s investment earnings with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(b) Provide additions to the Annuitant Reserve to meet the plan’s obligation for annuities payable under the Defined Benefit Supplement Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22140.

(a) “Improvement factor,” with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, means an increase of 2 percent in monthly allowances. The improvement factor shall be added to a monthly allowance each year on September 1, commencing on September 1 following the first anniversary of the effective date of retirement, or the date on which the monthly allowance commenced to accrue to any beneficiary, or other periods specifically stated in this part.

(b) The improvement factor may not be compounded nor shall it be applicable to annuities payable from the accumulated annuity deposit contributions or the accumulated tax-sheltered annuity contributions.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2014, the improvement factor shall vest for an active member in any calendar year in which active members paid increased member contributions pursuant to Section 22901.7.

(d) If, for any reason, the increased employee contribution referenced in subdivision (c), and as required by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 22901.7, ceases to be legally required to be made pursuant to the act that added this subdivision, then the Legislature reserves the right to adjust the amount of the improvement factor up or down as the economic conditions dictate for all members who retire on or after January 1, 2014. No adjustments of the improvement factor shall reduce the monthly retirement allowance or benefit below that which would be payable to the recipient under this
 part had this section not been enacted.

(e) For members who retired before the calendar year in which Section 22901.7 was added the Legislature reserves the right to adjust the amount of the improvement factor up or down as economic conditions dictate. Any adjustment of the improvement factor may not reduce the monthly retirement allowance or annuity below that which would be payable to the recipient under this part had this section not been enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   (AB 1469)   Effective June 24, 2014.   Amending action may become inoperative under conditions prescribed by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 13, subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

22141.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22140, “improvement factor” means an increase of 2 percent in benefits provided under Sections 24408 and 24409 for each year commencing September 1, 1981, and under Section 24410.5 for each year commencing September 1, 2001, and under Sections 24410.6 and 24410.7 for each year commencing September 1, 2002. The improvement factor shall not be compounded nor shall it be applicable to annuities payable from the accumulated annuity deposit contributions or the accumulated tax-sheltered annuity contributions. The Legislature reserves the right to adjust the amount of the improvement factor up or down as the economic conditions dictate. No adjustments of the improvement factor shall reduce the monthly retirement allowance
 or benefit below that which would be payable to the recipient under this part had this section not been enacted.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2014, the improvement factor shall vest for an active member in any calendar year in which active members paid increased member contributions pursuant to Section 22901.7.

(c) If, for any reason, the increased employee contribution referenced in subdivision (b), and as required by subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 22901.7, ceases to be legally required to be made pursuant to the act that added this subdivision, then the Legislature reserves the right to adjust the amount of the improvement factor up or down as the economic conditions dictate for all members who retire on or after January 1, 2014. No adjustments of the improvement factor shall reduce the monthly retirement allowance or benefit below that which would be payable to the recipient
 under this part had this section not been enacted.

(d) For members who retired before the calendar year in which Section 22901.7 was added, the Legislature reserves the right to adjust the amount of the improvement factor up or down as the economic conditions dictate. No adjustments of the improvement factor shall reduce the monthly retirement allowance or benefit below that which would be payable to the recipient under this part had this section not been enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 5.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22142.

“Indexed final compensation” means final compensation upon which a disability allowance or disability retirement allowance was based, adjusted annually from the school year in which an allowance begins to accrue by the rate of change in the average compensation earnable as determined by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22143.

“Investment manager” and “investment adviser” mean any person, firm, or custodian referred to in Section 22359, either appointed by or under contract with the board to engage in investment transactions or to manage or advise in the management of the assets of the Teachers’ Retirement Fund with respect to the Defined Benefit Program under this part and the Cash Balance Benefit Program under Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 6.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22144.

“Investment transactions” means investment services of an asset management or investment advisory nature and may include advisory services, research material, trading assistance, trading expenses, discretionary management of funds of the plan upon approval by the board, acquisition of equipment to be used as part of the investment function, services that provide a recommended course of action or personal expertise, investment-related legal expenses, investment-related contracting expenses, or custodian services referred to in Section 22359.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22144.3.

(a) “Leave of absence” means a period of leave to which a member is entitled that is expressly authorized or required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 44800) of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 87000) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 87400) of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3.

(b) “Leave of absence” also means employer-approved compensated leave that is excluded under subdivision (a) that was or is taken on or after January 1, 2016.

(c) Remuneration that is
 paid for an employer-approved compensated leave is creditable compensation pursuant to Sections 22119.2 and 22119.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 3.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

22144.5.

“Liability gains and losses” means the difference between actual noninvestment related experience and the experience expected based upon a set of noninvestment related actuarial assumptions during the period between two actuarial valuation dates, as determined in accordance with assumptions adopted by the board pursuant to Section 22311.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22145.

“Local system” means any retirement system, exclusive of this system, in which public school teachers are members, operated by a city, county, or other political subdivision of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22146.

“Member” means any person, unless excluded under other provisions of this part, who has performed creditable service as defined in Section 22119.5 or 22119.6 and has earned creditable compensation for that service and has not received a refund for that service and, as a result, is subject to the Defined Benefit Program. A member’s rights and obligations under this part with respect to the Defined Benefit Program shall be determined by the applicability of subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), and subject to any applicable exceptions under other provisions of this part.

(a) An active member is a member who is not retired or disabled and who earns creditable compensation
 during the school year.

(b) An inactive member is a member who is not retired or disabled and who has not earned creditable compensation during the current or preceding school year.

(c) A disabled member is a member to whom a disability allowance is payable under Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 24001).

(d) A retired member is a member who has terminated employment and has retired for service under the provisions of Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201), or has retired for disability under the provisions of Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100) or retired for service or disability under the provisions of Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 23400), and to whom a retirement allowance is therefore
 payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 782, Sec. 6.   (AB 963)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

22146.2.
